Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,262
Commission on Latino-Americans; created; term, defined.

There is hereby
created the Commission on Latino-Americans. For purposes of sections 81-8,262 to
81-8,271.01, commission means the Commission on Latino-Americans.

Laws 1972, LB 1081, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB139, § 1.